Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Authority for the Control of Fire Ants
[Repealed]

§§ 69-1-81 through 69-1-95.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1982, ch. 388, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

[En Laws, 1976, ch. 427, §§ 1-8; Am 1978, ch. 477, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1980, ch. 332, §§ 1-8; Re & Am 1982, ch. 388, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 269-271]

§§ 69-1-96 through 69-1-98.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1993, ch. 316, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1993).

§69-1-96. [En Laws, 1991, ch. 533, §§ 1-3]

§69-1-97. [En Laws, 1991, ch. 533, § 2]

§69-1-98. [En Laws, 1991, ch. 533, § 3]